Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Records

26A.200.
Records to be property of Court of Justice — Supreme Court control.

All records, as defined in KRS 171.410(1), which are made by or generated for or received by any agency of the Court of Justice, or by any other court or agency or officer responsible to such court created under the present Constitution, or a former Constitution, whether pursuant to statute, regulation, court rule, or local ordinance shall be the property of the Court of Justice and are subject to the control of the Supreme Court.

The Supreme Court shall determine which records were generated, made, or received by or for any court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 9.

26A.210.
Utilization of technical assistance and services of Department for Libraries and Archives — Records no longer needed may be offered to department.

The Supreme Court or the Administrative Office of the Courts may, upon appropriate agreement, utilize the technical assistance and services of the Department for Libraries and Archives.

When there is no further need for a record of the Court of Justice, the Supreme Court may offer the record to the Department for Libraries and Archives.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 10.

26A.220.
Supreme Court supervision and control of court records.

All public officers, public agencies, or other persons having custody, control, or possession of court records by statute or otherwise shall be subject to the direction of the Supreme Court with regard to such records and no such officer, agency, or person shall fail to comply with any rule, regulation, standard, procedure, or order issued by the Chief Justice or his designee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 11.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the order of the Supreme Court of Kentucky of May 18, 1979, it is implicit that old police court records are considered available to the Circuit Court and Circuit Court clerk of the particular county; therefore, the Circuit Court clerk is considered the custodian of such records for the court and as such custodian, the circuit clerk, or lawful deputy, may authenticate a copy of the order found in the police court order book for introduction at a subsequent trial, as provided by RCr 9.44 and CR 44.01.

OAG 80-181

.

Court records are given a special status and placed under the exclusive jurisdiction of the Court of Justice pursuant to KRS

26A.220

and this section; these statutes apply to all records of agencies of the court, and the Board of Bar Examiners is an agency of the court, as it is created and supervised by the Supreme Court. If a court or an agency of the court denies access to a record, the requesting party should take his appeal to the Chief Justice. Thus, denial of a request to inspect documents pertaining to the Kentucky bar examination under KRS

61.878

was proper.

OAG 85-9

.

Court records are outside the purview of Open Records provisions.

OAG 90-4

.

The custody and control of records maintained by the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission, including those containing the names of the members of the commission who heard requestor’s complaints, is vested in the Supreme Court. Accordingly, if a requestor is aggrieved by the denial of a record generated by the court, or an agency of the court, he must take his appeal to the Chief Justice.

OAG 91-45

.

The Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission, its members and employees are part and parcel of the court, and its records are inseparable from the judicial function.

OAG 91-45

.

The Open Records Act does not apply generally to records generated by the Judicial Retirement and Removal Commission inasmuch as the commission is an agency of the Court of Justice, created under authority of the Kentucky Constitution and Supreme Court Rule; records of the court and agencies of the court enjoy a special status and are placed under the exclusive jurisdiction of the Court of Justice pursuant to KRS

26A.200

and this section.

OAG 91-45

.

The Kentucky Bar Association is an agency of the court created and supervised by it and court records are given a special status under KRS

26A.200

and this section, and are exclusively governed by the Court of Justice.

OAG 91-47

.

The courts and judicial agencies are not bound by the provisions of the Open Records Act except to the extent that those provisions are not in conflict with the court’s rules and regulations governing access to its own records, and are accepted as a matter of comity. All records which are made by or generated for or received by any other court, agency, or officer responsible to the Court, are the property of the Court and are subject to the control of the Supreme Court. Court records are therefore given a special status, and placed under the exclusive jurisdiction of the court. OAG 98-ORD-6.

The Administrative Office of the Courts is not bound by the provisions of the Open Records Act. The AOC is part and parcel of the judicial department of the state and inseparable from the office of the Chief Justice itself; records generated by and for the AOC are indisputably records of the Court. It is for the Court to determine which policies evinced by the Open Records Law present interferences with the orderly conduct of its business, and which policies it will accept as a matter of comity. OAG 04-ORD-37.

Court Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) is not a “public agency” within the meaning of KRS 61.870(1), and is therefore not bound by the provisions of the Open Records Act. In addition, CASA officials and volunteers must keep confidential all information contained in records of the type requested except in conferring with or reports to the court pursuant to KRS 620.505(8), incorporated into the Open Records Act by virtue of KRS 61.878(1)(l). OAG 05-ORD-004.

26A.250.
Disqualification of prosecuting attorney — Appointment of a special prosecutor. [Repealed and reenacted.]

26A.260.
Web site to provide public access to expenditure records of judicial branch — Monthly and weekly updates — AOC is sole custodian of information and records — Branches to share software and applications.

By January 1, 2012, the Administrative Office of the Courts, under the direction of the Chief Justice, shall provide public access to records relating to expenditures of the judicial branch of state government through display of the records on a Web site. The Web site shall provide:

Financial information of expenditures not exempt under the provisions of state or federal law, including:

The payee name;

The category or type of the expenditure;

A description of the reason for the expenditure, if available;

The expenditure amount; and

A link to the financial document, if the document is electronically available;

A searchable format;

Access to the current enacted Judicial Branch Budget; and

A link to the public access Web site displays of the executive and legislative branches of state government, and of the public institutions of higher education.

Information on the Web site shall be updated at least on a monthly basis. However, information on the Web site which is part of, or contained in, an electronic accounting system utilized by all branches of state government, such as the Enhanced Management Administrative Reporting System (EMARS), shall be updated on a weekly basis.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall maintain exclusive control and be considered the sole custodian of all information and records generated by and through activity of the judicial branch of government, notwithstanding the situs of the information and records in another branch of government, and disclosure thereof shall only be by the Administrative Office of the Courts in accordance with applicable law.

In order to reduce Web site development costs and enhance public access and use of records viewed through Web sites as provided by this section and KRS

7.505

and

42.032

, each branch of state government shall freely share with the other branches of state government the software, software developments, and all applications, data, and information within its control used for Web site design, appearance, content, and operation in compliance with, or in furtherance of, the purposes contemplated by this section and KRS

7.505

and

42.032

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 105, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.